New York, session 2025-2026, S5293.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 803-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 803-c. Public health emergency allowances against indeterminate and 4 determinate sentences. 1. Every person confined in an institution of the 5 department or a facility in the department of mental hygiene serving an 6 indeterminate or determinate sentence of imprisonment, except a person 7 serving a sentence with a maximum term of life imprisonment, shall 8 receive a public health emergency time allowance against the term or 9 maximum term of such person's sentence imposed by the court. Such allow- 10 ances shall be granted for time served during a public health emergency 11 in accordance with this section if: 12 (a) the governor declares a state of disaster emergency pursuant to 13 section twenty-eight of the executive law in response to such public 14 health emergency; 15 (b) the public health emergency arises as a result of a communicable 16 or infectious disease; and 17 (c) the public health emergency results in the modification of correc- 18 tional facility operations. 19 2. Except as provided by subdivision three of this section, public 20 health emergency allowances awarded pursuant to subdivision one of this 21 section shall provide further remission from both the maximum and mini- 22 mum term of an incarcerated individual's sentence at the rate of six 23 months for each month, or portion thereof, served during a state of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09893-01-5 S. 5293 2 1 disaster emergency declared by the governor pursuant to section twenty- 2 eight of the executive law in response to the public health emergency. 3 3. Public health emergency allowances shall not be available to any 4 person serving an indeterminate or determinate sentence authorized for a 5 sex offense under article one hundred thirty of the penal law. 6 4. An incarcerated individual shall not be awarded a public health 7 emergency allowance in excess of twelve months of remission for any 8 single public health emergency. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.